nl: Baardverzorging voordelen: Antiroos; Conditionering; Pluis beheersing; Groeistimulatie; Jeukverlichting; Vochtinbrengend; Geurverbetering; Glansverhogend; Verzachtend; Styling hold; Andere
pt-BR: Benefícios de cuidados com a barba: Anticaspa; Condicionamento; Controle de frizz; Estímulo ao crescimento; Alívio da coceira; Hidratante; Realce aromático; Realce do brilho; Amaciante; Fixação para modelagem; Outro
sl-SI: Prednosti nege brade: Proti prhljaju; Balzam; Nadzor nakodranosti; Spodbujanje rasti; Lajšanje srbenja; Vlaženje; Dišavna izboljšava; Povečanje sijaja; Mehčanje; Držanje pričeske; Drugo
lt-LT: Barzdos priežiūros privalumai: Nuo pleiskanų; Kondicionuojantis; Pūkuotumo kontrolė; Augimo stimuliavimas; Niežulio palengvinimas; Drėkinamasis; Kvapo suteikimas; Blizgesio suteikimas; Minkštinamasis; Formavimo fiksavimas; Kita
en: Beard care benefits: Anti-dandruff; Conditioning; Frizz control; Growth stimulation; Itch relief; Moisturizing; Scented enhancement; Shine enhancing; Softening; Styling hold; Other
zh-TW: 鬍鬚保養的益處: 抗頭皮屑; 調理; 抗毛躁; 促進生長; 止癢; 保濕; 增香; 增亮; 柔軟; 定型; 其他
bg-BG: Ползи за грижа за брада: Защита от пърхот; Кондиционираща; Контрол на накъдрянето; Стимулиране на растежа; Облекчаване на сърбеж; Овлажняване; Ароматно подобрение; Подобряване на блясъка; Омекотяващ; Фиксиране при стилизиране; Други
sk-SK: Výhody starostlivosti o bradu: Proti lupinám; Príprava; Kontrola krepovatosti; Stimulácia rastu; Úľava od svrbenia; Zvlhčujúci; Voňavé vylepšenie; Zvýrazňujúci lesk; Zmäkčovanie; Tvarovanie účesu; Iné
fr: Avantages des soins de la barbe: Antipelliculaire; Revitalisant; Contrôle des frisottis; Stimulation de la croissance; Soulagement des démangeaisons; Hydratant; Parfum amélioré; Amélioration de la brillance; Adoucissant; Tenue de coiffage; Autre
fi: Parranhoidon hyödyt: Hilseenesto; Hoitoaine; Pörriytymisenesto; Kasvun stimulointi; Kutinan lievitys; Kosteuttava; Tuoksun parantaminen; Kiiltoa lisäävä; Pehmentävä; Muotoilun pito; Muu
pl: Korzyści z pielęgnacji brody: Przeciwłupieżowa; Kondycjonowanie; Kontrola puszenia; Stymulacja wzrostu; Łagodzenie swędzenia; Nawilżający; Wzmocnienie zapachu; Wzmacniający połysk; Zmiękczanie; Utrwalenie stylizacji; Inne
ko: 수염 관리 혜택: 비듬 방지; 컨디셔닝; 곱슬거림 제어; 성장 촉진; 가려움 완화; 보습; 향기 증진; 윤기 증진; 부드럽게; 스타일링 고정; 기타
de: Bartpflegevorteile: Anti-Schuppen; Konditionierung; Frizz-Kontrolle; Wachstumsstimulation; Juckreizlinderung; Befeuchtend; Duftverbesserung; Glanzfördernd; Weichmachend; Styling-Halt; Sonstiges
ru: Преимущества для бороды: Против перхоти; Кондиционирование; Контроль пушистости; Стимуляция роста; Облегчение зуда; Увлажнение; Ароматизированный; Придающий блеск; Смягчение; Фиксация укладки; Другой
ro-RO: Beneficii pentru îngrijirea bărbii: Anti-mătreață; Efect de balsam; Control încrețire; Stimulare creștere; Ameliorare mâncărime; Menține hidratarea; Îmbunătățire parfum; Sporire strălucire; Catifelare; Fixare coafare; Altele
th: ประโยชน์การดูแลเครา: ป้องกันรังแค; การปรับสภาพ; ควบคุมความชี้ฟู; กระตุ้นการเจริญเติบโต; บรรเทาอาการคัน; เติมความชุ่มชื้น; เพิ่มกลิ่นหอม; เพิ่มความเงางาม; ช่วยให้ดูอ่อนนุ่ม; จัดทรงอยู่ทน; อื่นๆ
vi: Lợi ích chăm sóc râu: Chống gàu; Dưỡng, xả; Kiểm soát xơ rối; Kích thích mọc; Giảm ngứa; Dưỡng ẩm; Tăng hương thơm; Tăng độ bóng; Làm mềm; Giữ kiểu; Khác
ja: ひげケア効果: ふけ防止; コンディショニング; くせ毛コントロール; 成長促進; かゆみ緩和; モイスチャライジング; 香り付け; ツヤ出し; 柔らかくする; スタイリングホールド; その他
da: Skægplejefordele: Anti-skæl; Behandlende; Kruskontrol; Vækststimulering; Kløelindring; Fugtgivende; Duftforbedring; Glansfremmende; Blødgørende; Stylinghold; Andet
sv: Fördelar med skäggvård: Antimjäll; Konditionerande; Kontroll av frissighet; Växtstimulering; Lindring av klåda; Återfuktande; Doftförbättring; Glansförhöjande; Uppmjukande; Stylinghållbarhet; Övrigt
cs: Přínosy péče o vousy: Ochrana proti lupům; Ošetřující; Kontrola krepatění; Stimulace růstu; Úleva od svědění; Zvlhčující; Parfémovaný efekt; Dodávání lesku; Změkčující; Stylizační fixace; Jiné
hr-HR: Prednosti njege brade: Protiv peruti; Njega; Kontrola kovrčanja; Poticanje rasta; Ublažavanje svrbeža; Vlaženje; Mirisno poboljšanje; Pojačavanje sjaja; Omekšavanje; Držanje frizure; Ostalo
el: Οφέλη περιποίησης γενειάδας: Κατά της πιτυρίδας; Φόρμα; Έλεγχος φριζαρίσματος; Διέγερση ανάπτυξης; Ανακούφιση από φαγούρα; Για ενυδάτωση; Αρωματική ενίσχυση; Ενίσχυση λάμψης; Για απαλότητα; Κράτημα στυλ; Άλλο
tr: Sakal bakım faydaları: Kepek önleyici; Bakım; Kabarma kontrolü; Büyümeyi uyarıcı; Kaşıntı giderici; Nemlendirici; Koku verici; Parlaklık verici; Yumuşatıcı; Şekillendirme tutuşu; Diğer
pt-PT: Benefícios de cuidados com a barba: Anticaspa; Condicionador; Controlo do frizz; Estimulação do crescimento; Alívio da comichão; Umectante; Realce perfumado; Realce do brilho; Amaciante; Fixação de penteado; Outro
hu: Szakállápolási előnyök: Korpásodás elleni; Kondicionálás; Göndörödés kontroll; Növekedés serkentő; Viszketés enyhítő; Nedvesítés; Illatosító; Fényesítő; Lágyítás; Formázás tartás; Egyéb
nb: Skjeggpleiefordeler: Motvirker flass; Conditioning; Kruskontroll; Vekststimulering; Kløelindring; Fuktighetsgivende; Duftforbedring; Glansfremmende; Mykgjørende; Stylinghold; Annet
zh-CN: 胡须护理益处: 抗头皮屑; 护理; 控制毛躁; 促进生长; 缓解瘙痒; 补水; 香氛增强; 增强光泽; 柔软; 造型定型; 其他
es: Beneficios del cuidado de la barba: Anticaspa; Acondicionador; Control del encrespamiento; Estimulación del crecimiento; Alivio del picor; Hidratante; Mejora del aroma; Potenciador del brillo; Suavizante; Fijación para el peinado; Otros
it: Benefici per la cura della barba: Anti-forfora; Trattante; Controllo crespo; Stimolazione crescita; Sollievo prurito; Emolliente; Profumazione; Lucidante; Vellutante; Tenuta styling; Altro